Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1820
Coroner's physician; appointment; when authorized; duties; compensation; mileage.

In each county there is hereby created the office of coroner's physician, who shall be appointed by the coroner of the county and be removable by the coroner, at a salary or schedule of fees or both to be set by the county board and to be paid by the county. Such physician shall certify the cause of death in every case of death in such county not certified by an attending physician and shall perform or cause to be performed an autopsy when requested by the coroner or as provided in section 23-1824. Such physician shall perform such other services in aid of the coroner as shall be requested by the coroner and shall be reimbursed for mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled by the most direct route while in the performance of such physician's duties.

Laws 1907, c. 35, § 1, p. 169;

R.S.1913, § 5682;

C.S.1922, § 5012;

Laws 1925, c. 97, § 1, p. 283;

Laws 1929, c. 109, § 1, p. 403;

C.S.1929, § 26-1521;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 5, p. 385;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-1521;

R.S.1943, § 23-1820;

Laws 1949, c. 44, § 1, p. 147;

Laws 1963, c. 121, § 1, p. 467;

Laws 1967, c. 125, § 3, p. 401;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 81;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 30;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 46, § 2.